California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 718, Sec. 25.   (SB 855)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Consistency of State and Local Public Agency Actions [85225. - 85225.30.]

85225.

A state or local public agency that proposes to undertake a covered action, prior to initiating the implementation of that covered action, shall prepare a written certification of consistency with detailed findings as to whether the covered action is consistent with the Delta Plan and shall submit that certification to the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85225.5.

To assist state and local public agencies in preparing the required certification, the council shall develop procedures for early consultation with the council on the proposed covered action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85225.10.

(a) Any person who claims that a proposed covered action is inconsistent with the Delta Plan and, as a result of that inconsistency, the action will have a significant adverse impact on the achievement of one or both of the coequal goals or implementation of government-sponsored flood control programs to reduce risks to people and property in the Delta, may file an appeal with regard to a certification of consistency submitted to the council.

(b) The appeal shall clearly and specifically set forth the basis for the claim, including specific factual allegations, that the covered action is inconsistent with the Delta Plan. The council may request from the appellant additional information
 necessary to clarify, amplify, correct, or otherwise supplement the information submitted with the appeal, within a reasonable period.

(c) The council, or by delegation the executive officer, may dismiss the appeal for failure of the appellant to provide information requested by the council within the period provided, if the information requested is in the possession or under the control of the appellant.

(d) For purposes of this section, “person” includes a person as defined in Section 19, and any state or local public agency, as defined in Section 10535.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

85225.15.

The appeal shall be filed no later than 30 days after the submission of the certification of consistency. If no person appeals the certification of consistency, the state or local public agency may proceed to implement the covered action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85225.20.

The appeal shall be heard by the council within 60 days of the date of the filing of the appeal, unless the council, or by delegation the executive officer, determines that the issue raised on appeal is not within the council’s jurisdiction or does not raise an appealable issue. The council shall make its decision on the appeal within 60 days of hearing the appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85225.25.

After a hearing on an appealed action, the council shall make specific written findings either denying the appeal or remanding the matter to the state or local public agency for reconsideration of the covered action based on the finding that the certification of consistency is not supported by substantial evidence in the record before the state or local public agency that filed the certification. Upon remand, the state or local agency may determine whether to proceed with the
 covered action. If the agency decides to proceed with the action or with the action as modified to respond to the findings of the council, the agency shall, prior to proceeding with the action, file a revised certification of consistency that addresses each of the findings made by the council and file that revised certification with the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85225.30.

The council shall adopt administrative procedures governing appeals, which shall be exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Delta Watermaster [85230. - 85230.]

85230.

(a) The board, in consultation with the council, shall appoint, for a term of four years, a special master for the Delta, whose title shall be “the Delta Watermaster.”

(b) The board shall adopt internal procedures delegating authority to the Delta Watermaster. The Delta Watermaster shall exercise the board’s authority to provide timely monitoring and enforcement of board orders and license and permit terms and conditions. The Delta Watermaster’s delegated authority shall include authority to require monitoring and reporting, authority for approvals delegated to an officer or employee of the board by the terms of a water right permit or license, authority to approve temporary urgency changes pursuant to Chapter 6.6
 (commencing with Section 1435) of Part 2 of Division 2, and authority to issue a notice of a proposed cease and desist order or administrative civil liability complaint. The Delta Watermaster’s authority shall be limited to diversions in the Delta, and for the monitoring and enforcement of the board’s orders and license and permit terms and conditions that apply to conditions in the Delta.

(c) The internal procedures adopted by the board shall provide for due process in adjudicative proceedings, and may establish procedures for the issuance of a stay of any order or decision of the Delta Watermaster for which a petition for reconsideration is filed or reconsideration is ordered under Section 1122. The board may provide any additional duties or needs of the Delta Watermaster that the board deems necessary for effective day-to-day enforcement of its decisions.

(d) The Delta
 Watermaster shall submit regular reports to the board and the council including, but not limited to, reports on water rights administration, water quality issues, and conveyance operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 317.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Delta Independent Science Board and Delta Science Program [85280. - 85280.]

85280.

(a) The Delta Independent Science Board is hereby established in state government.

(1) The Delta Independent Science Board shall consist of no more than 10 members appointed by the council. The term of office for members of the Delta Independent Science Board shall be five years. A member may serve no more than two terms.

(2) Members of the Delta Independent Science Board shall be nationally or internationally prominent scientists with appropriate expertise to evaluate the broad range of scientific programs that support adaptive management of the Delta. The members shall not be directly affiliated with a program or agency
 subject to the review activities of the Delta Independent Science Board.

(3) The Delta Independent Science Board shall provide oversight of the scientific research, monitoring, and assessment programs that support adaptive management of the Delta through periodic reviews of each of those programs that shall be scheduled to ensure that all Delta scientific research, monitoring, and assessment programs are reviewed at least once every four years.

(4) Notwithstanding being appointed and administered by the council, members of the Delta Independent Science Board shall not be employees of the Delta Stewardship Council and shall
 exercise their scientific judgment and perform the functions set forth in this section independently from the council. 

(5) The Delta Independent Science Board shall submit to the council a report on the results of each review, including recommendations for any changes in the programs reviewed by the board.

(b) After consultation with the Delta Independent Science Board, the council shall appoint a lead scientist for the Delta Science Program.

(1) The lead scientist shall meet all of the following qualifications:

(A) Hold an advanced degree in a field related to water or ecosystem management.

(B) Have a strong record of scientific research and publication in peer-reviewed scientific journals in a field related to water or ecosystem management.

(C) Have experience advising high-level managers in science-based decisionmaking in the areas of water management and ecosystem restoration.

(D) Have the capability to guide the application of an adaptive management process to resource management policy decisions in the Delta.

(2) The term of office for the lead scientist shall be no more than three years. The lead scientist may serve no more than two terms.

(3) The lead scientist shall oversee the implementation of the Delta Science
 Program. In carrying out that responsibility, the lead scientist shall regularly consult with the agencies participating in the program.

(4) The mission of the Delta Science Program shall be to provide the best possible unbiased scientific information to inform water and environmental decisionmaking in the Delta. That mission shall be carried out through funding research, synthesizing and communicating scientific information to policymakers and decisionmakers, promoting independent scientific peer review, and coordinating with Delta agencies to promote science-based adaptive management. The Delta Science Program shall assist with development and periodic updates of the Delta Plan’s adaptive management program.

(c) The Delta Science Program shall function as a replacement for,
 and successor to, the CALFED Science Program and the Delta Independent Science Board shall replace the CALFED Independent Science Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (SB 821)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. COMPREHENSIVE DELTA PLANNING [85300. - 85360.]



  CHAPTER 1. The Delta Plan [85300. - 85310.]

85300.

(a) On or before January 1, 2012, the council shall develop, adopt, and commence implementation of the Delta Plan pursuant to this part that furthers the coequal goals. The Delta Plan shall include subgoals and strategies to assist in guiding state and local agency actions related to the Delta. In developing the Delta Plan, the council shall consider each of the strategies and actions set forth in the Strategic Plan and may include any of those strategies or
 actions in the Delta Plan. The Delta Plan may also identify specific actions that state or local agencies may take to implement the subgoals and strategies.

(b) In developing the Delta Plan, the council shall consult with federal, state, and local agencies with responsibilities in the Delta. All state agencies with responsibilities in the Delta shall cooperate with the council in developing the Delta Plan, upon request of the council.

(c) The council shall review the Delta Plan at least once every five years and may revise it as the council deems appropriate. The council may request any state agency with responsibilities in the Delta to make recommendations with respect to revision of the Delta Plan.

(d) (1) The council shall develop the Delta Plan consistent with all of the following:

(A) The federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et seq.), or an equivalent compliance mechanism.

(B) Section 8 of the federal Reclamation Act of 1902.

(C) The federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.).

(2) If the council adopts a Delta Plan pursuant to the federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et seq.), the council shall submit the Delta Plan for approval to the United States Secretary of Commerce pursuant to that act, or to any other federal official assigned responsibility for the Delta pursuant to a federal statute enacted after January 1, 2010.

(e) The council shall report to the Legislature no later than March 31, 2012, as
 to its adoption of the Delta Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85301.

(a) The commission shall develop, for consideration and incorporation into the Delta Plan by the council, a proposal to protect, enhance, and sustain the unique cultural, historical, recreational, agricultural, and economic values of the Delta as an evolving place, in a manner consistent with the coequal goals. For the purpose of carrying out this subdivision, the commission may include in the proposal the relevant strategies described in the Strategic Plan.

(b) (1) The commission shall include in the proposal a plan to establish state and federal designation of the Delta as a place of special significance, which may include application for a federal designation of the Delta as a National Heritage Area.

(2) The commission shall include in the proposal a regional economic plan to support increased investment in agriculture, recreation, tourism, and other resilient land uses in the Delta. The regional economic plan shall include detailed recommendations for the administration of the Delta Investment Fund created by Section 29778.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) For the purposes of assisting the commission in its preparation of the proposal, both of the following actions shall be undertaken:

(1) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall prepare a proposal, for submission to the commission, to expand within the Delta the network of state recreation areas, combining existing and newly designated areas. The proposal may incorporate appropriate aspects of any existing plans, including the Central Valley Vision Implementation Plan adopted by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(2) The Department of Food and Agriculture shall prepare a proposal, for submission to the commission, to establish market incentives and infrastructure to protect and enhance the economic and public values of Delta agriculture.

(d) The commission shall submit the proposal developed pursuant to subdivision (a) to the council. The council shall consider the proposal and may include any portion of the proposal in the Delta Plan if the council, in its discretion, determines that the
 portion of the proposal is feasible and consistent with the objectives of the Delta Plan and the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85302.

(a) The implementation of the Delta Plan shall further the restoration of the Delta ecosystem and a reliable water supply.

(b) The geographic scope of the ecosystem restoration projects and programs identified in the Delta Plan shall be the Delta, except that the Delta Plan may include recommended ecosystem projects outside the Delta that will contribute to achievement of the coequal goals.

(c) The Delta Plan shall include measures that promote all of the following characteristics of a healthy Delta ecosystem:

(1) Viable populations of native resident and migratory species.

(2) Functional corridors for migratory species.

(3) Diverse and biologically appropriate habitats and ecosystem processes.

(4) Reduced threats and stresses on the Delta ecosystem.

(5) Conditions conducive to meeting or exceeding the goals in existing species recovery plans and state and federal goals with respect to doubling salmon populations.

(d) The Delta Plan shall include
 measures to promote a more reliable water supply that address all of the following:

(1) Meeting the needs for reasonable and beneficial uses of water.

(2) Sustaining the economic vitality of the state.

(3) Improving water quality to protect human health and the environment.

(e) The following subgoals and strategies for restoring a healthy ecosystem shall be included in the Delta Plan:

(1) Restore large areas of interconnected habitats within the Delta and its watershed by 2100.

(2) Establish migratory corridors for fish, birds, and other animals along selected Delta river channels.

(3) Promote self-sustaining, diverse populations of native and valued species by reducing the risk of take and harm from invasive species.

(4) Restore Delta flows and channels to support a healthy estuary and other ecosystems.

(5) Improve water quality to meet drinking water, agriculture, and ecosystem long-term goals.

(6) Restore habitat necessary to avoid a net loss of migratory bird habitat and, where feasible, increase migratory bird habitat to promote viable populations of migratory birds.

(f) The council shall consider, for incorporation into the Delta Plan, actions designed to implement the subgoals and strategies described in subdivision (e).

(g) In carrying out this section, the council shall make use of the best available science.

(h) The Delta Plan shall include recommendations regarding state agency management of lands in the Delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85303.

The Delta Plan shall promote statewide water conservation, water use efficiency, and sustainable use of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85304.

The Delta Plan shall promote options for new and improved infrastructure relating to the water conveyance in the Delta, storage systems, and for the operation of both to achieve the coequal goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85305.

(a) The Delta Plan shall attempt to reduce risks to people, property, and state interests in the Delta by promoting effective emergency preparedness, appropriate land uses, and strategic levee investments.

(b) The council may incorporate into the Delta Plan the emergency preparedness and response strategies for the Delta developed by the California Emergency Management Agency pursuant to Section
 12994.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85306.

The council, in consultation with the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, shall recommend in the Delta Plan priorities for state investments in levee operation, maintenance, and improvements in the Delta, including both levees that are a part of the State Plan of Flood Control and nonproject levees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85307.

(a) The Delta Plan may identify actions to be taken outside of the Delta, if those actions are determined to significantly reduce flood risks in the Delta.

(b) The Delta Plan may include local plans of flood protection.

(c) The council, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, may address in the Delta Plan the effects of
 climate change and sea level rise on the three state highways that cross the Delta.

(d) The council, in consultation with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission and the Public Utilities Commission, may incorporate into the Delta Plan additional actions to address the needs of Delta energy development, energy storage, and energy distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85308.

The Delta Plan shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Be based on the best available scientific information and the independent science advice provided by the Delta Independent Science Board.

(b) Include quantified or otherwise measurable targets associated with achieving the objectives of the Delta Plan.

(c) Where appropriate, utilize monitoring, data collection, and analysis of actions sufficient to determine progress toward meeting the quantified targets.

(d) Describe the methods by which the council shall measure progress toward achieving the coequal goals.

(e) Where appropriate, recommend integration of scientific and monitoring results into ongoing Delta water management.

(f) Include a science-based, transparent, and formal adaptive management strategy for ongoing ecosystem restoration and water management decisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85309.

The department, in consultation with the United States Army Corps of Engineers and the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, shall prepare a proposal to coordinate flood and water supply operations of the State Water Project and the federal Central Valley Project, and submit the proposal to the council for consideration for incorporation into the Delta Plan. In drafting the proposal, the department shall consider all related actions set forth in the Strategic Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85310.

The provisions of the Delta Plan are severable. If any provision of the Delta Plan is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 324, Sec. 3.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Bay Delta Conservation Plan [85320. - 85322.]

85320.

(a) The Bay Delta Conservation Plan (BDCP) shall be considered for inclusion in the Delta Plan in accordance with this chapter.

(b) The BDCP shall not be incorporated into the Delta Plan and the public benefits associated with the BDCP shall not be eligible for state funding, unless the BDCP does all of the following:

(1) Complies with
 Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(2) Complies with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, including a comprehensive review and analysis of all of the following:

(A) A reasonable range of flow criteria, rates of diversion, and other operational criteria required to satisfy the criteria for approval of a natural community conservation plan as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 2820 of the Fish and Game Code, and other operational requirements and flows necessary for recovering the Delta ecosystem and restoring fisheries under a reasonable range of hydrologic conditions, which will identify the remaining water available for export and other beneficial uses.

(B) A reasonable range of Delta conveyance alternatives, including
 through-Delta, dual conveyance, and isolated conveyance alternatives and including further capacity and design options of a lined canal, an unlined canal, and pipelines.

(C) The potential effects of climate change, possible sea level rise up to 55 inches, and possible changes in total precipitation and runoff patterns on the conveyance alternatives and habitat restoration activities considered in the environmental impact report.

(D) The potential effects on migratory fish and aquatic resources.

(E) The potential effects on Sacramento River and San Joaquin River flood management.

(F) The resilience and recovery of Delta conveyance alternatives in the event of catastrophic loss caused by earthquake or flood or other natural disaster.

(G) The potential effects of each Delta conveyance alternative on Delta water quality.

(c) The department shall consult with the council and the Delta Independent Science Board during the development of the BDCP. The council shall be a responsible agency in the development of the environmental impact report. The Delta Independent Science Board shall review the draft environmental impact report and submit its comments to the council and the Department of Fish and Game.

(d) If the Department of Fish and Game approves the BDCP as a natural community conservation plan pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code, the council shall have at least one public hearing concerning the incorporation of the BDCP into the Delta Plan.

(e) If the Department of Fish and Game approves the BDCP as a natural community conservation plan pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code and determines that the BDCP meets the requirements of this section, and the BDCP has been approved as a habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Section 1531 et seq.), the council shall incorporate the BDCP into the Delta Plan. The Department of Fish and Game’s determination that the BDCP has met the requirements of this section may be appealed to the council.

(f) The department, in coordination with the Department of Fish and Game, or any successor agencies charged with BDCP implementation, shall report to the council on the implementation of the BDCP at least once a year, including the status of monitoring programs and adaptive management.

(g) The council may make recommendations to BDCP implementing agencies regarding the implementation of the BDCP. BDCP implementing agencies shall consult with the council on these recommendations. These recommendations shall not change the terms and conditions of the permits issued by state and federal regulatory agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85321.

The BDCP shall include a transparent, real-time operational decisionmaking process in which fishery agencies ensure that applicable biological performance measures are achieved in a timely manner with respect to water system operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

85322.

This chapter does not amend, or create any additional legal obligation or cause of action under, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code or Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Other Plans for the Delta [85350. - 85350.]

85350.

The council may incorporate other completed plans related to the Delta into the Delta Plan to the extent that the other plans promote the coequal goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 39.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Legal Action [85360. - 85360.]

85360.

(a) A legal challenge to the council’s adoption or amendment of the Delta Plan or its appeals procedures adopted pursuant to Section 85225.30 shall be brought pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 90 days of the date of the council’s final decision.

(b) A legal challenge to the council’s determination of an appeal decided pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 85225) of Part 3 shall be brought pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 90 days of the date the council adopts its written findings pursuant to Section 85225.25.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 324, Sec. 4.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

